Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB556.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 65 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1103.1. Transportation, lodging, hospitality, cash and gifts.(a) General rule.--A public official or public employee or the spouse of a public official or public employee may not solicit or accept, directly or indirectly, any transportation, lodging, hospitality, cash, gift or anything of economic value as a gift from a person who:(1) Has or is seeking a contractual, business or financial relationship with the public official's or public employee's governmental body, including the acquisition of a grant or loan.12345678910111213141516171819 (2) Is compensated to influence the passage or defeat of legislation by the public official's or public employee's governmental body.(3) Conducts operations or activities which are regulated by the public official's or public employee's governmental body.(4) Has an economic interest which may be substantially affected by the performance or nonperformance of the public official's or public employee's official job duties.(b) Exceptions.--The prohibition stated in subsection (a) shall not apply to the following:(1) Gifts from a relative or friend, unless the relative or friend is in a restricted relationship as delineated in subsection (a). For the purposes of this paragraph, the term "friend" shall not include a registered lobbyist or principal.(2) A contribution as defined in section 1621(b) of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, lawfully made under that act.(3) Informational materials that are sent to the office of the public official in the form of books, articles, periodicals, other written materials, audiotapes, videotapes or other forms of communication for nonentertainment purposes.(4) Awards or prizes that are given to competitors in contests or events open to the public, including random drawings.(5) Honorary academic degrees and academic awards from not-for-profit educational institutions in this Commonwealth and associated travel, food, refreshments and entertainment 20250HB0556PN0557 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 provided in the presentation of the academic degrees and academic awards. Associated travel, food, refreshments and entertainment provided in the presentation of academic degrees and academic awards shall be reported in accordance with section 1105(b) (relating to statement of financial interests).(6) Training provided to a public official or public employee, if the training is in the interest of the governmental entity. This paragraph shall include food and refreshments furnished to all attendees as an integral part of the training. Training provided under this paragraph and food and refreshments furnished to attendees as an integral part of the training shall be reported in accordance with section 1105(b). The exception under this paragraph shall not apply in any of the following circumstances:(i) The organization sponsoring the training is funded or sponsored, directly or indirectly, by a registered lobbyist or principal.(ii) The public official or public employee or the spouse of the public official or public employee is prohibited from soliciting or accepting transportation, lodging, hospitality, cash, a gift or anything of economic value as a gift from the organization sponsoring the training.(7) An educational mission, including a meeting with government officials, either foreign or domestic, intended to educate public officials on matters of public policy, to which the public official may be invited to participate along with other Federal, State or local public officials and community leaders. Transportation, lodging, hospitality, 20250HB0556PN0557 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cash, a gift or anything of economic value received as a gift as part of an educational mission shall be reported in accordance with section 1105(b). The exception under this paragraph shall not apply in any of the following circumstances:(i) T he organization sponsoring the educational mission is funded or sponsored, directly or indirectly, by a registered lobbyist or principal.(ii) The public official or public employee or the spouse of the public official or public employee is prohibited from soliciting or accepting transportation, lodging, hospitality, cash, a gift or anything of economic value as a gift from the organization sponsoring the educational mission.(8) Anything paid for by the Federal Government, State government or other government or governmental entity under a government contract.(9) A plaque, trophy or other item that is substantially commemorative in nature and has minimal value.(10) Light food or refreshments, such as hors d'oeuvres, provided in a group setting and intended for mass consumption and not intended for the consumption of a specific employee. Light food or refreshments as specified under this paragraph shall be reported in accordance with section 1105(b). The exception under this paragraph shall not apply in any of the following circumstances:(i) The organization providing the light food or refreshments is funded or sponsored, directly or indirectly, by a registered lobbyist or principal.(ii) The public official or public employee or the 20250HB0556PN0557 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 spouse of the public official or public employee is prohibited from soliciting or accepting transportation, lodging, hospitality, cash, a gift or anything of economic value as a gift from the organization providing the light food or refreshments.(11) Items of nominal economic value such as greeting cards, pens, caps or shirts or refreshments provided within the context of a meeting such as complimentary water, coffee, tea or similar refreshments.Section 2. Section 1105(b)(6) and (7) of Title 65 are amended to read:§ 1105. Statement of financial interests.* * * (b) Required information.--The statement shall include the following information for the prior calendar year with regard to the person required to file the statement:* * *(6) The name and address of the source and the amount of any gift or gifts valued in the aggregate at [$250] $50 per year or more from the same source and the circumstances of each gift. This paragraph shall not apply to a gift or gifts received from a spouse, parent, parent by marriage, sibling, child, grandchild[,] or other family member or friend when the circumstances make it clear that the motivation for the action was a personal or family relationship. However, for the purposes of this paragraph, the term "friend" shall not include a registered lobbyist or an employee of a registered lobbyist.(7) The name and address of the source and the amount of any payment for or reimbursement of actual expenses for 20250HB0556PN0557 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 transportation and lodging or hospitality, a cash payment, a gift or anything of economic value as a gift received in connection with public office or employment where such actual expenses for transportation and lodging or hospitality exceed [$650] $0 in an aggregate amount per year. The payment for or reimbursement of actual expenses shall be identified by the type of expenses. This paragraph shall not apply to expenses reimbursed by a governmental body or to expenses reimbursed by an organization or association of public officials or employees of political subdivisions which the public official or employee serves in an official capacity.* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0556PN0557 - 6 - 12345678910111213